Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,142.04
Incorporated municipality; sales and use tax; election; notice.

The governing body shall give notice of the submission of the question of imposing the sales and use tax upon the same transactions within such municipality on which the State of Nebraska is authorized to impose a tax, not more than thirty days nor less than ten days previous to the election, by publication one time in one or more newspapers published in or of general circulation in the municipality in which such question is to be submitted. Such notice shall be in addition to any other notice required under the general election laws of this state.

Laws 1978, LB 394, § 5.